Washington statutes.
RCW 6.25.030

Issuance of writ—Grounds.

The writ of attachment may be issued by the court in which the action is pending on one or more of the following grounds:

(1) That the defendant is a foreign corporation; or

(2) That the defendant is not a resident of this state; or

(3) That the defendant conceals himself or herself so that the ordinary process of law cannot be served upon him or her; or

(4) That the defendant has absconded or absented himself or herself from his or her usual place of abode in this state, so that the ordinary process of law cannot be served upon him or her; or

(5) That the defendant has removed or is about to remove any of his or her property from this state, with intent to delay or defraud his or her creditors; or

(6) That the defendant has assigned, secreted, or disposed of, or is about to assign, secrete, or dispose of, any of his or her property, with intent to delay or defraud his or her creditors; or

(7) That the defendant is about to convert his or her property, or a part thereof, into money, for the purpose of placing it beyond the reach of his or her creditors; or

(8) That the defendant has been guilty of a fraud in contracting the debt or incurring the obligation for which the action is brought; or

(9) That the damages for which the action is brought are for injuries arising from the commission of some felony, gross misdemeanor, or misdemeanor.

[ 2023 c 102 s 7; 2011 c 336 s 147; 1987 c 442 s 803; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 16; 1923 c 159 s 1; 1886 p 39 s 2; RRS s 648. Prior: Code 1881 ss 174-192; 1877 pp 35-40; 1873 pp 43-50; 1871 pp 9, 10; 1869 pp 41-47; 1863 pp 112-120; 1860 pp 30-36; 1854 pp 155-162. Formerly RCW 7.12.020.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: CR 64.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.